Washington statutes.
RCW 7.52.460

Guardian or limited guardian of incompetent or disabled person may receive proceeds—Bond.

The guardian or limited guardian who may be entitled to the custody and management of the estate of an incompetent or disabled person adjudged incapable of conducting his or her own affairs, whose interest in real property shall have been sold, may receive in behalf of such person his or her share of the proceeds of such real property from the referees, on executing a bond with sufficient sureties, approved by the judge of the court, conditioned that he or she faithfully discharge the trust reposed in him or her, and will render a true and just account to the person entitled, or to his or her legal representative.

[ 2011 c 336 s 234; 1977 ex.s. c 80 s 9; Code 1881 s 597; 1877 p 124 s 602; 1869 p 142 s 551; RRS s 883.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Intent—Severability—1977 ex.s. c 80: See notes following RCW 4.16.190.